South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3334.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Government Efficiency Act." SECTION 2.  Article 15, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-1050.  (A)(1) There is created the "South Carolina Government Efficiency Task Force" to develop recommendations for improving and streamlining governmental operations, to include downsizing as appropriate, reduction and streamlining of regulations, and cost reduction measures. The task force shall convene no later than June 2025, and every four years after. The task force shall complete its work within one year and submit its recommendations to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor. The task force may submit all or part of its recommendations at any time during the year, but a final report summarizing its recommendations must be submitted at the completion of its work. (2) The task force is composed of fifteen members. Five members are appointed by the President of the Senate, five members are appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and five members are appointed by the Governor. (3) The task force must be composed of members of the General Assembly and also representatives from both the private and public sectors, all as designated by the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of the officer who appointed the member. A vacancy on the task force must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (B) The task force shall elect a chair from among its members. (C) The task force shall meet as necessary, but at least quarterly, at the call of the chair and at the time and place designated by him. The task force may conduct its meetings through teleconferencing or other similar means. (D) Members of the task force are entitled to receive reimbursement for per diem, mileage, and subsistence as provided by law for members of boards, commissions, and committees while engaged in the work of the task force. (E) Staff to assist the task force in performing its duties must be assigned by the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor. The task force shall consider reports issued by the Legislative Audit Council, the Legislative Oversight Committee, and internal and external audit reports in developing its recommendations. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----